Utah statutes.
63I-4-303.   Duties of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.

(1)  The Governor's Office of Planning and Budget shall:

(a)  determine the amount of an appropriation that is no longer needed by an executive branch agency because all or a portion of the agency's provision of a good or service is privatized; and

(b)  adjust the governor's budget recommendations to reflect the amount determined under Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  The Governor's Office of Planning and Budget shall report its findings to the Legislature.

(3)  This section does not prevent the governor from recommending in a budget recommendation the restoration of a portion of the appropriation to an agency that is reduced under this section.

